Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
674

INDIVIDUAL
CLAIMS RESOLUTION UNDER THE

HAWAIIAN
HOME LANDS TRUST

Part I. Purpose and Definitions

Section

674-1 Purpose

674-2 Definitions

Part II. Individual Claims Review Panel

674-3 Establishment of the board of individual
claims

resolution

674-4 Tenure and compensation of members

674-5 Panel staff; power to contract

674-6 Rulemaking powers

674-7 Review by panel required

674-8 Powers and procedures of the panel

674-9 Panel hearing or review proceedings;
fact-finding;

evidence

674-10 Findings and advisory opinion

674-11 Subsequent litigation; excluded evidence

674-12 Immunity of panel members from liability

674-13 Legal adviser

674-14 Annual report

674-15 Limitations upon award of compensation or
corrective

action

674-15.5 Preclusion of title-related claims

Part III. Judicial Relief for Retroactive
Claims by

Individual Native Hawaiians

674-16 Waiver of immunity

674-17 Right to sue, individual claims

674-18 Scope of relief

674-19 Limitation on actions

674-20 No implied liability or award

674-21 Attorney's fees and costs

Note

Hawaiian home lands trust claims. L 1992, c 316; L 1993, c
352.

Cross References

Lands conveyed for development of housing projects, see
§§10-13.6 and 171-18.5.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Native Hawaiian Trusts Judicial Relief Act: The First
Step in an Attempt to Provide Relief. 14 UH L. Rev. 889 (1992).

Ke Ala Pono--The Path of Justice: The Moon Court's Native
Hawaiian Rights Decisions. 33 UH L. Rev. 447 (2011).

A Modest Proposal for Determining Class Member Damages:
Aggregation and Extrapolation in the Kalima v. State Breach of Homelands Trust
Class Action. 34 UH L. Rev. 1 (2012).

Case Notes

Trial court erred in granting plaintiffs the right to sue for
breach of contract under chapter 661 where, with respect to the individual
beneficiary claims under this chapter, the language of Act 14, L Sp 1995 merely
indicated the legislature's expressed desire for "title-related"
claims to be settled in a timely manner. 111 H. 84, 137 P.3d 990 (2006).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next